hypenationFiles/fo_FO/hyph_fo_FO.UTF-8.dic
rg3a
rg3il
rg4a.
rg4an
rg4ar
rg6ar.
rgd5ar
rgd7ar.
rging8ar.
rgj5ar
rgj7ar.
rher8uri
ri2a
ri2d
ri2g
ri2i
ri2k
ri2l
rí2l
ri2m
rí2m
ri2n
rí2n
ri2p
ri2s
ri2t
rí2t
ri2u
ri2v
rí2v
ri3as
rí3ið
ri3in
ri3ka
ri3kl
ri3ma
ri3mi
ri3mu
ri3na
ri3ta
ri3tu
ri3um
ri3us
ri3va
ri4ið
.ri4ma
ri4sa
ri4st
.ri4tu
ri5as.
ri5ass
rí5ið.
ri5na.
ri5us.
ri6ið.
ri6sti
ri6stn
rið4ar
rid4da
rið6ar.
rii4nu
rii5num
rii7num.
rik4an
rim4an
rim4in
rin4ga
rin4um
rin5se
ring7ar.
ris4to
rj2a
rj2i
rj2u
rj4ar
rj4un
rj6ar.
rk2a
rk2i
rk2l
rk2n
rk2s
rk2u
rk2v
rk3ar
rk3in
rk3la
rk4is
rk6is.
rka4ra
rkj5un
rkj5ur
rkj7uni
rkj9uni.
rkn5ey
rko5su
rl2a
rl2en
rl2i
rl2s
rl2u
rl3an
rl3se
rla4st
rm2a
rm2i
rm3an
rm3ar
rm3un
rm4að
rm6aðu
rn2a
rn2d
rn2es
rn2i
rn2o
rn2s
rn2u
rn3ar
rn3in
rn3is
rn3or
rn4að
rn4ar.
rn4ey
rnað7ar.
rnd5ar
rnd7ar.
ro2c
ro2g
ro2k
ro2la
ró2m
ró2n
ro2nd
ro2ng
ro2pi
ro2r
ro2s
ro2t
ro2v
ró2v
ro3gr
ro3ku
ro3st
róð5sk
róð6ur
róð8ur.
.róð9ur.
ron6di
ross7tei
rótt7ar.
roy4sk
rp2s
rr2as
rr2e
rr2i
rr2o
rr2u
rs2a
rs2et
rs2ka
rs2ku
rs2l
rs2of
rs2om
rs2on
rs2or
rs2ta
rs2ti
rs2tu
rs2v
rs2æ
rs2øg
rs3ko
rserk9arag
rsk4ir
rsk4ur
rsk6ir.
rsk6ur.
rsl5ur
rstýr8is.
rsy4st
rt2a
rt2el
rt2i
rt2r
rt2s
rt2u
rt3an
rt3ar
rt3as
rt4ug
rta4st
rtíð7ar.
ru2d
ru2k
ru2l
ru2m
ru2na
ru2nd
ru2nu
ru2s
rú2s
ru2t
rú2t
ru3sa
rú3sa
ru3sk
ru3tr
.ru4sk
ru4sl
ru5ski
rúð4ar
rúl4li
rur3na
rurn6ar.
rv2a
rv2i
rv2s
rv3ar
rv4is
rv5ar.
ry2g
ry2k
rý2l
ry2n
ry2s
ry2v
ry3st
rygg8ing
ræ2d
ræ2l
ræ3di
ræ4la
ræl4si
rø2g
rø2r
røð5ur
røðing9ar.
røk4ur
røk6ur.
s1a
s1á
s1b
s1d
s1e
s1f
s1g
s1h
s1i
s1j
s1k
s1l
s1m
s1n
s1o
s1p
s1r
s1s
s1t
s1u
s1ú
s1v
s1æ
s1ø
.s2a
s2a.
.s2á
s2ab
s2af
.s2e
s2eð
s2ek
s2el
s2em
s2en
s2er
s2es
s2ey
s2hi
.s2i
s2ia
s2il
s2it
.s2j
s2je
s2jó
s2ju
s2jú
s2jø
.s2k
s2k.
s2ke
s2ki
s2kj
s2ko
s2kó
s2kr
s2l.
s2le
s2lo
.s2m
s2mi
.s2n
s2ní
.s2o
.s2p
s2pi
s2s.
s2sh
.s2t
s2t.
s2te
s2tf
s2th
s2tn
s2to
s2tó
s2ty
s2tý
s2tø
.s2u
s2u.
.s2ú
s2uk
.s2v
.s2æ
.s2ø
s2øk
s2øl
s3að
s3in
s3is
s3lá
s3lj
s3lø
s3me
s3mo
s3my
s3se
s3um
s3ve
.s4að
.s4in
.s4l
.s4mo
.s4ve
sa2g
sa2k
sa2l
sá2l
sa2m
sá2m
sa2n
sa2r
sá2r
sa2s
sá2s
sa2t
sá2t
sa2v
sa3ka
sa3la
sa3lo
sa3nu
sa3ra
sa3rí
sa4go
.sa4ka
sa4na
.sa5kar
.sa6kar.
.sa6karm
sað4al
sak4ar
sál4ar
sal4ti
sál6ar.
salt7ing
sam4ur
sam5me
sam6ur.
samband9ið.
san4da
san4ga
san6um
sar4an
sar5ar
sarí7ið.
sarn6ar.
sb2a
sd2a
sd2j
sd2r
se2g
se2kk
se2ks
se2kt
se2la
se2ld
se2lt
se2mi
se2nd
se2ns
se2nt
se2ra
se2rk
se2rv
se2ss
se2t
sem4in
ser5að
serk6ara
serk8arag
set5ur
seting9ar.
seyð9ur.
sg2a
sha4ni
si2g
si2k
sí2l
si2ld
si2ls
si2lv
sí2n
si2na
si2nd
si2ni
si2nk
si2ns
si2nt
si2nu
si2ó
si2p
si2r
si3ga
si4gi
si4ón
sil4da
sil4sk
sin4ga
sin4um
sing7ar.
sión7in.
sit4an
sj2a
sj2á
sjó4na
sk2a
sk2if
sk2in
sk2u
sk2v
sk3ar
sk3ir
sk3ur
sk3va
sk4að
.sk4ar
sk4un
.sk4ur
.sk4va
sk5ara
sk5aru
sk5ir.
sk5ur.
ska4rar
ska4st
skap7ar.
skj5an
sl2a
sl2en
sl2i
sl2ok
sl2u
sl3in
sl4ur
sl5ing
sl6ure
sli4ga
sm2a
sm2í
sm2u
sm4að
smað9ur.
sn2a
sn2e
sn2i
sn2o
sn2u
sn3is
sn4ik
so2d
so2f
so2g
so2l
só2l
so2m
so2n
só2n
so2p
so2r
so2v
so4na
sókn7ar.
.sókn8ar.
sól4ar
sorg8ar.
.sorg9ar.
sp2a
sp2l
sp2r
sp2u
sp3ur
.sp4ur
spo4li
spo6lit
sr2i
sr2ø
ss2a
ss2á
ss2i
ss2k
ss2o
ss2p
ss2t
ss2u
ss3an
ss3ar
ss3ir
ss3te
ss3ti
ss3ur
ss5tei
ssi5ón
sst4in
sstýr8is.
st2a
st2em
st2er
st2i
st2j
st2k
st2l
st2na
st2of
st2ol
st2on
st2op
st2or
st2ov
st2r
st2u
st3ar
st3he
st3in
st3ki
st3la
st3lu
st4ad
st4að
st4nar
st4ug
st4um
st4ur
st5ar.
st5ara
st5ing
st5inu
st6að.
st6aðn
.st6ar
st6ur.
sta4vi
ste5ma
stk4in
stov7uni
stov9uni.
str5ar
str7ar.
stýr7is.
su2l
su2mb
su2n
su2r
sú2t
sun4ar
sur3na
surn6ar.
sv2a
sv2i
svi4ka
sy2n
sý2r
sy2s
sy3st
.sy4st
sy5ste
syst6kin
sæ2d
sæ2l
sø2g
sø2r
søg4ur
søg6in
søm4an
t1a
t1b
t1d
t1e
t1f
t1g
t1h
t1i
t1j
t1k
t1l
t1m
t1n
t1o
t1r
t1s
t1t
t1u
t1ú
t1v
.t2a
.t2e
t2ed
t2ee
t2ei
t2en
t2ep
t2ev
t2ey
.t2h
t2ha
t2he
t2ho
t2hr
t2hu
.t2i
.t2j
t2jó
.t2o
t2o.
t2ob
t2om
t2oy
.t2r
t2ro
t2ró
.t2u
.t2ú
.t2v
t3ad
t3að
t3hú
t3ið
t3ir
t3is
t3lø
t3se
t3sh
t3sj
t3sk
t3st
t3sy
t3sø
t3tø
t3ug
t3um
t3un
t3ur
.t4un
.t4ur
ta2b
ta2dr
ta2f
ta2i
ta2k
tá2k
ta2l
tá2l
ta2m
ta2n
ta2p
ta2r
tá2r
ta2s
tá2s
ta2t
tá2t
ta2v
ta3di
ta3la
ta3li
ta3ma
ta3mi
ta3st
ta3ti
ta3tu
ta3vi
.ta4la
.ta4li
.ta4ma
ta4sj
.ta4st
ta5lia
tað6ur
tað8ur.
tak4ka
tal5ur
tam4an
tam4ar
tan4da
tan4ga
tan4um
tan6um.
tang7ar.
tar4va
tar5ar
tarn6ar.
tas4tr
tau5ra
tav4ir
td2r
te2k
te2l
te2m
te2nd
te2nn
te2ns
te2nt
te2r
te2s
te2t
te4ma
tek4ni
tekt7ar.
tend7ur.
ter4a.
ter4na
ter4ra
tf2l
tg2a
tg2i
þo2r
þó2r
ti2a
ti2c
ti2g
ti2i
ti2k
ti2l
ti2m
tí2m
ti2n
tí2n
ti2o
ti2ó
tí2t
ti2v
tí2v
ti3an
ti3ka
ti3on
ti4ið
ti4ón
ti4st
.ti5ón
ti6ón.
ti6óni
ti6óns
.ti7ón.
tíð4ar
tíð6ar.
.tíð7ar.
tig5ar
tik4ar
tin4ga
tin4um
ting7ar.
tj2a
tj4að
tjóð7ar.
tk2i
tk2v
tk3in
tk5ina
tl2a
tl2e
tl2i
tl2u
tl3ar
tli4ga
tm2a
tn2a
tn2i
tn2s
tn3ar
tn3in
tn3is
tn3sk
tn5is.
tnað7ar.
to2f
to2g
to2k
to2l
tó2l
tó2m
to2n
tó2n
to2p
to2r
tó2r
to2s
to2v
to3gr
to3ki
to3li
to3ri
to3vi
to5rii
to5riu
tol4ik
tol4la
tori6inu
tori7inum
tori8ið.
torii9num.
tov4un
tov6uni
tov8uni.
tr2a
tr2e
tr2i
tr2í
tr2og
tr2ok
tr2ot
tr2u
tr2ø
tr3at
tr3in
tr4að
tr4ar
tr4ið
tr6ar.
tri4na
tri4va
tri6na.
trótt8ar.
ts2a
ts2ka
ts2ku
ts2l
ts2ta
ts3le
tsl5ur
tt2a
tt2e
tt2i
tt2o
tt2r
tt2u
tt2ú
tt3ar
tt3in
tt4ið
tt4ir
tt4is
tt4ur
tt5ar.
tt5ing
tt6ur.
ttan7um.
ttr5ar
ttr7ar.
tu2d
tu2l
tu2na
tu2ni
tu2nu
tu2rg
tu2rs
tu2s
tú2s
tu2t
tú2t
tu3sk
tu3su
tur3in
tur3na
tur5in.
turn6ar.
tut6ur
tv2a
tv2i
tveð9ur.
tý2d
ty2g
ty2k
tý2r
týr4in
týr4is
týr6is.
tæn4as
tæn5ast
.tæn6ast
tæn7astu
.tæn8astu
.tæn9astu.
tø2g
tø2r
tøð5ur
tøk4ur
u1b
ú1b
u1d
u1e
u1f
ú1f
u1g
u1h
u1i
u1k
u1l
u1m
u1n
u1o
u1r
u1s
ú1s
u1t
ú1t
u1v
u2g.
u2gt
u2ku
.u2l
.u2m
u2m.
u2mm
u2mp
.u2n
u2n.
u2nf
u2ng
u2nk
u2nn
u2no
u2nt
.u2r
u2r.
u2rð
u2rf
u2rh
u2ri
u2rk
u2rn
u2rr
u2rv
.ú2s
.u2t
.ú2t
u3de
ú3fl
u3gø
u3lá
u3le
u3li
u3lj
u3lu
u3má
u3me
u3mi
u3mo
u3rá
u3re
u3rú
u3sl
ú3st
u3th
u3ti
ú3tí
úa2r
ub2a
ud2a
úð2a
ud2d
ud2n
ud2s
uð2s
uð2u
úð2u
úð3ar
úð4i
ue2r
uf2l
úf2la
úf2lu
ug2a
ug2d
ug2g
ug2l
ug2n
ug2r
ug2u
úg2u
úg2v
úging8ar.
ugl5oy
ui2n
ui2s
uk2a
úk2a
uk2k
úk2k
uk2l
uk2s
úk2s
uk2t
úk2t
úk2u
uk2ur
úk3ar
úk3ur
uk4le
úka4ra
ul2a
úl2a
ul2d
ul2en
ul2er
ul2f
ul2ig
ul2l
úl2l
ul2s
ul2t
úl2u
ul2v
úl3an
ul3la
úl3li
ul3tu
.ul4la
ul4un
uli4ga
ull4ar
ull5ur
ull6ar.
.ull7ar.
ult6ur
um2a
um2b
úm2d
um2in
um2ma
um2mi
um2pa
um2s
um3l
um3st
umi4ni
un2a
ún2a
un2d
un2gd
un2gu
un2i
un2ka
ún2n
un2na
un2ni
un2ns
un2nu
un2u
un3ar
un3in
un3ur
ún4að
un4al
.un4ar
un4di
una3li
und4ir
und5ar
und6ir.
und7ar.
.und7ir.
unn5il
unning9ar.
uo2r
úp2a
up2s
úp3ar
up4sa
ur2a
ur2d
ur2g
ur2in
ur2it
ur2ka
ur2l
ur2na
ur2o
ur2ri
ur2s
ur2t
úr2t
ur2u
úr2u
ur2vi
ur3af
ur3am
ur3ga
ur3gi
ur3la
.ur3na
ur3sæ
ur4in.
urð6ar
urð7ar.
url4an
urn4ar
urn5ar.
.urn6ar.
us2a
ús2a
us2i
ús2i
us2k
ús2k
us2p
us2s
ús2s
us2t
ús2ta
us2u
ús3ar
us3tr
ús4in
ús5ar.
ús6inu
usk4ar
ust4in
ust6inu
ut2a
út2a
út2i
ut2ió
ut2n
ut2r
út2s
ut2t
út2t
út3af
ut3an
út3an
út3in
út3o
út3r
ut4u
ut5ur
uti5ón
uti7ón.
utt4ar
utt6ar.
uu2s
uv2u
v1a
v1d
v1f
v1g
v1i
v1j
v1l
v1m
v1r
v1s
v1t
v1u
v1v
.v2a
v2a.
.v2i
.v2r
v3að
v3is
v3re
v3ro
v3se
v3sk
v3só
v3te
v3tø
v3uð
v3ur
.v4að
.v4is
va2g
vá2g
va2k
va2l
va2n
va2r
vá2r
va2s
va2t
vá2t
va2v
va3ga
va3li
va3lu
va3sa
va3st
vá3tr
va4na
va4rá
vab4ar
vag5ar
val4da
val4la
van3ar
van4da
van4ga
var4ma
var5ar
varð8ar.
varing9ar.
varn6ar.
vát5ur
vát7ur.
vd2a
vð2i
ve2g
ve2k
ve2l
ve2n
ve2r
ve2s
ve2t
ve3st
.ve4st
veð6ur
veð8ur.
veð8urs
veg4ur
vein7ar.
vel4ta
veld7is.
.veld8is.
ven4ti
ver5si
verj8ar.
.verj9ar.
vet5ur
vet7ur.
vg2r
vi2a
vi2c
vi2d
vi2g
vi2k
vi2l
ví2l
vi2m
vi2n
ví2n
vi2r
vi2t
ví2t
vi3an
vi3ga
vi3ka
vi3ta
vi3te
vi4st
.vi4ta
vi5tam
vig5ar
vik4ar
vin4ga
vin6ar
ving7ar.
ving7ars
virk8is.
.virk9is.
vit4an
vit5is
vj2a
vj2i
vl2a
vl2o
vl4oy
vm2a
vn2a
vn2d
vn2i
vn2t
vn2u
vn3an
vn3ar
vn3in
vn3ur
vn4di
vnað7ar.
vnd5ar
vnd7ar.
vning8ar.
vo2g
vó2n
vo2r
vo2t
vr2a
vr2ek
vr2ok
vs2et
vs2i
vs2t
vs3ø
vt2o
vt3en
vu2l
vu2n
vu2rs
vu2s
vv2a
vv2i
vvi4ta
væ2l
vø2g
vø2r
vø3rí
vøð5ur
vør4vi
vørð9ur.
w1b
wa2s
xim4um
y1a
ý1á
y1b
ý1d
y1g
ý1í
y1k
y1l
ý1l
ý1m
y1n
ý1r
y1s
y1t
y1u
y1v
ý1v
.y2n
.y2t
.y2v
y3ar
y3kj
y3lo
y3ví
ya2m
ýá2t
yb2u
ýd2a
yð2a
yð2i
ýð2i
yd2n
ýd2n
yð2r
yð2s
ýð2u
yð3an
yð3ar
yð3se
yð3si
yð4u
yð5ur
yð7ur.
yg2d
yg2g
ýg2g
yg2i
yg2l
yg2n
yg2s
yg2u
yg3a
yg4a.
ygd5ar
ygd7ar.
ygg5in
ygg7ing
ygg9inga
yin4ga
ying7ar.
ying7arn
ying7ur.
ýís4ta
yk2a
yk2i
yk2k
yk2l
yk2t
yl2a
yl2d
yl2g
ýl2i
yl2l
yl2on
yl2s
ýl2u
yl3la
ym2a
ym2b
ym2i
ym2l
ym2s
ym3is
ym4bi
yms4la
yn2a
yn2d
ýn2d
yn2i
ýn2i
yn2j
yn2n
yn2s
yn2t
ýn2u
yn3ar
ýn3in
ýn3is
yn4di
ynd4ri
ynd5ar
ynd7ar.
ýning8ar.
yns4ki
yp2a
yp2i
yp2s
yp2t
yp2u
yp3ar
yp3in
ypa4ra
yps5ko
ýr2a
yr2d
ýr2d
yr2g
yr2i
ýr2i
yr2j
yr2k
yr2l
yr2n
yr2r
yr2s
ýr2u
ýr3as
yr3in
ýr3in
ýr3is
yr4gj
yr4st
ýr5ing
ýr5inu
ýr5is.
ýra4st
yri5st
yrj5un
yrk5is
yrk7is.
yrn5ar
ys2a
ys2i
ýs2i
ys2j
ys2k
ýs2k
ýs2l
ys2n
ys2s
ys2t
ýs2t
ys2u
ys3ar
ýs3kv
ys3ur
ys5ur.
ysa4ra
ýsing8ar.
ysk4ar
ysk4ir
ysk4ur
ysk6ir.
ysk6ur.
yst4ki
yst5kin
yst5ur
yst7kin.
yst7ur.
ystr8ar.
yt2a
ýt2a
yt2i
ýt2i
ýt2n
yt2r
yt2t
ýt2t
yt2u
ýt2u
yt3ar
ýt3as
yt3in
ýt3in
ýt3ut
ýta4st
ýting8ar.
yv2a
yv2i
yv2j
yv2r
yv3ar
yv5ar.
zak4ar
zi3s
æ1d
æ1f
æ1l
æ3la
.æ4l
æd2d
æd2i
æð2i
æd2n
æð2r
æð2s
æð2u
æð4is
ædi4ka
æg2s
æk2k
æk2n
æk2s
æka4ri
ækj5ur
æl2an
æl2i
æl2o
æl2s
æl2t
æl3in
æl3is
æl3si
æl4oy
æl4u
æl5um
æls5is
æm2s
æn2a
æn2d
æn2k
æn2t
æn3ar
æn3as
æna4st
ær2a
ær2d
ær2i
ær2r
ær2s
ær2u
ær3in
ær3is
æring8ar.
æs2i
æs2t
æt2a
æt2i
æt2l
æt2n
æt2t
æt3an
æt4ið
æt4is
æt4u
æt5ur
ætt5ur
æv2a
æv2i
æv2u
æv3at
æv3in
ø1g
ø1r
.ø2r
ø3re
øb2l
ød2a
ød2d
øð2g
øð2i
øð2r
øð2u
ød3an
øð4ur
øð6uræ
øðing8ar.
øðing8ur.
øe2r
øg2a
øg2d
øg2g
øg2n
øg2r
øg2u
øg3re
øg3ur
øg4i
øg5in
øg5urn
øgl4in
øk2k
øk2l
øk2n
øk2s
øk2t
øk2u
øk3ur
øk4i
øk4ti
øk5ur.
øk5urn
økj5ar
øl2a
øl2d
øl2i
øl2l
øl2s
øl2u
øl3in
øl3is
øm2a
øm2i
øm3an
øm3in
øm3is
øm5is.
øn2a
øn2d
øn2i
øn2s
øn2t
øn2u
øn3ar
øn3ta
øp2i
øp2u
ør2a
ør2d
ør2i
ør2í
ør2j
ør2k
ør2n
ør2r
ør2s
ør2t
ør2u
ør2v
ør3da
ør3in
ør3o
ør3re
ør3tr
ør3um
ør3vi
ør5um.
øra5ge
ørð6ur
ørð8ur.
ørv5is
øs2k
øs2t
øsk4ur
øsk6ur.
øt2a
øt2i
øt2t
øt2u
øt3in
øv2d
øv2u
øv3un
øv4ur
aa2d
aa2r
aad4mi
ål2a
ål2e
